District of Columbia statutes.
10-1701

Taxation without representation federal tax pay-out message board installation.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the Council of the District of Columbia shall install, adjacent to the outside front wall of the John A. Wilson Building, a programmable electronic message board sign showing the dollar amount of federal taxes paid by the residents of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the Mayor shall install, on public space within 200 feet of the baseball stadium, currently called Nationals Park, a programmable electronic message board sign showing the dollar amount of federal taxes paid by the residents of the District of Columbia.

(c)

The signs shall be large enough for the public to easily read and designed and placed in such a location so as not to deter from the architectural character of the exterior of the John A. Wilson Building or the exterior of Nationals Park.

(d)

Preference for the design, manufacture, installation, and maintenance of the signs shall be given to businesses certified as small, local, or disadvantaged business enterprises by the Department of Small and Local Business Development.

Oct. 21, 2008, D.C. Law 17-232, § 2, 55 DCR 9008
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 17-232, see § 7021 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 17-232, see § 7021 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-232 provided that Section 2(b) shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 7021 of D.C. Law 18-111 repealed section 3 of D.C. Law 17-232.